Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Chapter 38

Refugee Absorptive Capacity Act

4-38-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Refugee Absorptive Capacity Act.”

Acts 2011, ch. 316, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the preamble to the act creating the Refugee Absorptive Capacity Act, please refer to Acts 2011, ch. 316.

4-38-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Absorptive capacity” is a determination made by a local government evaluating, for a host community within that jurisdiction:

The capacity of the community's social service and healthcare agencies to meet the existing needs of the community's current residents;

The availability of affordable housing, low-cost housing, or both, and existing waiting lists for such housing in the community;

The capacity of the local school district to meet the needs of the existing or anticipated refugee student population; and

The ability of the local economy to absorb new workers without causing competition with local residents for job opportunities, displacing existing local workers, or adversely affecting the wages or working conditions of the local workforce;

“Local government” or “local governments” refers to either the city council, governing body of any county having a metropolitan form of government, or county legislative body which regulates any host community being considered for refugee resettlement activity;

“Tennessee office for refugees” means the state office which administers the refugee program for this state, or the entity or agency to whom the state has delegated such function and that has been designated and recognized by the federal government to administer such program; and

“Tennessee refugee coordinator” means the official designated by the Tennessee office for refugees.

Acts 2011, ch. 316, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. For the preamble to the act creating the Refugee Absorptive Capacity Act, please refer to Acts 2011, ch. 316.

4-38-103. Duties of Tennessee office for refugees.

The Tennessee office for refugees shall:

Provide at least a written quarterly report to representatives of local governments to plan and coordinate the appropriate placement of refugees in advance of the refugees' arrival, and appear before the local government to provide additional information at the request of the local government. Specifically, the local government may request reporting of information related to the factors of absorptive capacity as stated in § 4-38-102;

Ensure that representatives of local resettlement agencies, local community service agencies, and other publicly-funded or tax-exempt agencies that serve refugees in this state shall upon request meet with representatives of local governments to plan and coordinate the appropriate placement of refugees in the host community in advance of the refugees' arrival;

Execute a letter of agreement with each agency providing refugee resettlement services in this state. The letter of agreement shall require the parties to mutually consult and prepare a plan for the initial placement of refugees in a host community and set forth the continuing process of consultation between the parties. The provisions of the letter of agreement shall be consistent with federal law regulating the resettlement of refugees;

At least quarterly transmit to the chairs of the state government committee of the house of representatives and state and local government committee of the senate, and to the chair of the budget committee of either the city council or the county legislative body regulating the host community copies of:

The letters of agreement;

Any initial refugee placement plans prepared pursuant to letters of agreement; and

Any communications received and responded to pursuant to subdivision (5), including how or to the extent any issue regarding the concerns of host communities and representatives of local governments was resolved; and

Ensure that residents of host communities and representatives of local governments are aware that any and all concerns regarding local refugee resettlement activities in any host community shall be filed with the Tennessee office for refugees and further that the Tennessee office for refugees shall respond timely in writing to all such communications.

Acts 2011, ch. 316, § 3; 2013, ch. 236, § 71.

Compiler's Notes. For the preamble to the act creating the Refugee Absorptive Capacity Act, please refer to Acts 2011, ch. 316.

4-38-104. Request for moratorium.

Based on the factors in § 4-38-102(1), upon the adoption of a resolution the legislative body of a local government may request a moratorium on new refugee resettlement activities, documenting that the host community lacks absorptive capacity and that further resettlement of refugees in the host community would result in an adverse impact to existing residents. Such resolution shall be forwarded to the Tennessee office for refugees for appropriate action pursuant to subsection (b).

The Tennessee office for refugees shall accept and may forward to the United States state department, the request from a local government for a moratorium on new refugee resettlement activities in a host community which lacks absorptive capacity. The United States state department may thereafter implement the request for a moratorium.

Upon notice of a determination made pursuant to this section, the United States state department may thereafter suspend additional resettlement of refugees in that community, until the state refugee coordinator and the local government have jointly determined that absorptive capacity for refugee resettlement exists to implement any further refugee resettlement activities in the host community.

The period of validity of a moratorium described in subsection (c) or any extension thereof, shall not exceed one (1) year.

Acts 2011, ch. 316, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. For the preamble to the act creating the Refugee Absorptive Capacity Act, please refer to Acts 2011, ch. 316.

Attorney General Opinions. The legislative branch or the executive branch of the State of Tennessee may not refuse to accept for resettlement within the State individuals whom the federal government has processed and admitted to the United States as refugees. OAG 15-77, 2015 Tenn. AG LEXIS 78 (11/30/2015).